Utah statutes.
61-2d-106.   Arbitration clauses.
To be valid, an arbitration clause in a high-cost mortgage contract must
comply with the standards set forth in Title 78B, Chapter 11, Utah Uniform
Arbitration Act or the Federal Arbitration Act, or any successor acts.
